Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB590.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5343YC (6) 91 dg/ko H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 232.141, subsection 8, Code 2026, is 1 amended by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu 2 thereof the following: 3 8. All costs for a childâs shelter care shall be paid by the 4 department. 5 Sec. 2. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ 6 REIMBURSEMENT OF SHELTER CARE COSTS. The department of health 7 and human services shall amend the departmentâs rules pursuant 8 to chapter 17A to require the department to pay all costs for a 9 childâs shelter care as that term is defined in section 232.2. 10